Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF184.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 1253YH (4) 91 cm/jh H.F. 184 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 92.25 Employer liability. 1 Notwithstanding section 92.24, an employer who employs a 2 minor is strictly liable for any injury or death of the minor 3 that occurs in the course and scope of the minor employeeâs 4 employment. 5